nb: Varer til stearinlyssett medfølger: Stearinlysetiketter; Stearinlysveker; Form; Røreredskap; Termometer; Vokssmeltepunkt; Vekeholder; Annet
lt-LT: Elementai, esantys žvakių rinkinyje: Žvakių etiketės; Žvakių dagčiai; Forma; Maišymo įrankis; Termometras; Vaško lydymo indas; Dagčių laikikliai; Kita
sv: Ljussatsartiklar ingår: Ljusetiketter; Ljusvekar; Form; Omrörningsverktyg; Termometer; Vaxsmältdegel; Vekhållare; Övrigt
da: Lyssæt medfølger: Stearinlysetiketter; Stearinlysvæger; Form; Omrøringsværktøj; Termometer; Vokssmeltegryde; Vægeholdere; Andet
ja: キャンドルキットのアイテム (詳細): キャンドルラベル; キャンドルの芯; 型; 撹拌具; 体温計; ワックス溶解ポット; 芯ホルダー; その他
zh-CN: 随附蜡烛套件物品: 蜡烛标签; 蜡烛芯; 模具; 搅拌工具; 温度计; 蜡熔炉; 蜡烛芯座; 其他
fr: Articles du kit de bougies inclus: Étiquettes de bougies; Mèches de bougies; Moule; Outil d'agitation; Thermomètre; Cire fondante; Porte-baguettes; Autre
hu: A csomagban található gyertyakészlet elemei: Gyertyacímkék; Gyertyakanócok; Öntőforma; Keverőeszköz; Hőmérő; Viaszolvasztó edény; Kanóctartók; Egyéb
bg-BG: Включени елементи за комплекта свещи: Етикети за свещи; Фитили за свещи; Форма; Инструмент за разбъркване; Термометър; Съд за топене на восък; Държачи за фитили; Други
zh-TW: 蠟燭工具包含有品項: 蠟燭標籤; 燭芯; 模具; 攪拌工具; 溫度計; 蠟熔鍋; 攪拌器架; 其他
nl: Inclusief kaarsensetartikelen: Etiketten voor kaarsen; Kaarslonten; Mal; Roergereedschap; Thermometer; Smeltkroes voor was; Lonthouders; Andere
ro-RO: Articole incluse în kitul pentru lumânări: Etichete pentru lumânări; Fitiluri pentru lumânări; Matriță; Instrument de amestecare; Termometru; Oală de topit ceara; Suporturi pentru fitil; Altele
tr: Mum seti öğeleri dahil: Mum etiketleri; Mum fitilleri; Kalıp; Çırpma aleti; Termometre; Balmumu eritme cezvesi; Fitil tutucular; Diğer
de: Inbegriffene Kerzenset-Artikel: Kerzenetiketten; Kerzendochte; Form; Rührutensil; Thermometer; Wachsschmelztiegel; Dochthalter; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Itens de kit de vela incluídos: Etiquetas de velas; Pavios de vela; Mofo; Ferramenta de mistura; Termómetro; Panela para derreter cera; Castiçais; Outro
pt-BR: Itens do kit de velas incluídos: Etiquetas de velas; Pavios de vela; Mofo; Ferramenta de agitação; Termômetro; Caldeirão de cera; Porta-pavios; Outro
pl: W zestawie elementy zestawu świec: Etykiety świec; Knoty świecowe; Forma; Narzędzie do mieszania; Termometr; Tygiel do topienia wosku; Uchwyty na knot; Inne
es: Artículos del kit de velas incluidos: Etiquetas para velas; Pabilos para velas; Molde; Herramienta de mezcla; Termómetro; Fundidor de cera; Porta mechas; Otros
fi: Mukana kynttiläsarjan tuotteita: Kynttilän etiketit; Kynttilän sydänlangat; Muotti; Sekoitin; Lämpömittari; Vahan sulatusastia; Sydänpitimet; Muu
it: Articoli del kit di candele inclusi: Etichette per candele; Stoppini per candele; Stampo; Miscelatore; Termometro; Pentolino sciogli cera; Supporti per bacchette; Altro
hr-HR: Artikli uključeni u komplet za izradu svijeća: Etikete za svijeće; Fitilji za svijeće; Kalup; Alat za miješanje; Termometar; Lonac za topljenje voska; Držači za fitilj; Ostalo
vi: Bộ nến đi kèm: Nhãn nến; Bấc nến; Khuôn; Dụng cụ khuấy; Nhiệt kế; Nồi nấu sáp; Thanh đỡ bấc; Khác
th: รายการอุปกรณ์ทำเทียนที่รวมอยู่: ฉลากเทียน; ไส้เทียน; แม่พิมพ์; เครื่องมือผสม; เทอร์โมมิเตอร์; หม้อหลอมขี้ผึ้ง; ที่วางไส้เทียน; อื่นๆ
cs: Včetně sady svíček: Štítky na svíčky; Svíčkové knoty; Forma; Míchací nástroj; Teploměr; Tavicí nádoba na vosk; Držáky knotů; Jiné
ko: 캔들 키트 품목 포함: 캔들 라벨; 양초 심지; 금형; 교반 도구; 온도계; 왁스 멜팅 팟; 심지 홀더; 기타
el: Περιλαμβάνονται είδη κιτ κεριών: Ετικέτες κεριών; Φυτίλια κεριών; Καλούπι; Εργαλείο ανάδευσης; Θερμόμετρο; Δοχείο τήξης κεριού; Καντηλίθρες; Άλλο
en: Candle kit items included: Candle labels; Candle wicks; Mold; Stirring tool; Thermometer; Wax melting pot; Wick holders; Other
sl-SI: Priložene komponente v kompletu za izdelavo sveč: Etikete za sveče; Stenji za sveče; Kalup; Orodje za mešanje; Termometer; Lonec za topljenje voska; Držala za stenj; Drugo
ru: Состав набора для изготовления свечей: Этикетки для свечей; Фитили для свечей; Форма; Инструмент для перемешивания; Термометр; Емкость для растопки воска; Держатели фитилей; Другое
sk-SK: Položky súpravy na výrobu sviečok v cene: Etikety na sviečky; Sviečkové knôty; Forma; Nástroj na miešanie; Teplomer; Nádoba na tavenie vosku; Držiaky knôtu; Iné